src/fst/morphology/oldstuff/sme-tests.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: sme/bin/sme-gen.hfst
    Morph: sme/bin/sme.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: sme/bin/isme-norm.fst
    Morph: sme/bin/sme-norm.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - bietna: # -a stem, root vowel -ie-
    bietna+N+Sg+Nom: bietna
    bietna+N+Sg+Gen: biena
    bietna+N+Sg+Acc: biena
    bietna+N+Sg+Ill: bitnii
    bietna+N+Sg+Loc: bienas
    bietna+N+Sg+Com: bienain
    bietna+N+Pl+Nom: bienat
    bietna+N+Pl+Gen: bienaid
    bietna+N+Pl+Acc: bienaid
    bietna+N+Pl+Ill: bienaide
    bietna+N+Pl+Loc: bienain
    bietna+N+Pl+Com: bienaiguin
    bietna+N+Ess: bietnan
